Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.215

Juveniles found to have committed violent or sex offense or stalking—Notification of discharge, parole, leave, release, transfer, or escape—To whom given—School attendance—Definitions.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:

(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside; and

(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside.

(b)(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of an individual who is found to have committed a violent offense or a sex offense, is twenty-one years of age or younger, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent, to the designated recipient of the school where the juvenile either: (A) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or (B) has expressed an intention to enroll following his or her release. This notice must also include the restrictions described in subsection (5) of this section.

(ii) The community residential facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to the designated recipient of any school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the community residential facility.

(iii) As used in this subsection, "designated recipient" means: (A) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (B) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (C) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(c) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific juvenile:

(i) The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings involving the offense; and

(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.

(d) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.

(e) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

(2)(a) If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.

(b) The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the offense was a homicide.

In case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3), (4), and (5).

(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(4) The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(5) Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district.

(6) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c) "Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;

(d) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children.

[ 2021 c 206 s 5; 2020 c 167 s 7; 1999 c 198 s 1; 1997 c 265 s 2; 1995 c 324 s 1. Prior: 1994 c 129 s 6; 1994 c 78 s 1; 1993 c 27 s 1; 1990 c 3 s 101.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Findings—Appropriation—Rental vouchers—2021 c 206: See notes following RCW 72.01.412.

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.

Findings—Intent—1994 c 129: See note following RCW 4.24.550.